Utah statutes.
13-38a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  "Financial transaction card" means any card, code, or other means of access to a person's account issued to a person that allows the person to obtain, purchase, or receive any of the following:

(i)  goods;

(ii)  services;

(iii)  money; or

(iv)  anything else of value.

(b)  "Financial transaction card" includes:

(i)  a credit card;

(ii)  a credit plate;

(iii)  a bank services card;

(iv)  a banking card;

(v)  a check guarantee card;

(vi)  a debit card;

(vii)  a telephone credit card; and

(viii)  a device for access as defined in Section 7-16a-102.

(2)  "Receipt" means any document related to the transaction of business provided to a person that uses a financial transaction card.

(3) (a)  "Seller" means a person that accepts payment by a financial transaction card.

(b)  "Seller" does not include:

(i)  a government entity; or

(ii)  a person acting on behalf of a government entity.

(4) (a)  "Surcharge" means an additional charge added to a transaction paid for by using a credit card, but not added to a transaction paid for by a means other than a credit card.

(b)  "Surcharge" does not include:

(i)  an exclusion from a discount that is offered on transactions paid for by means other than a credit card;

(ii)  a fee charged by a credit card company for use of a credit card; or

(iii)  a fee authorized under Section 7-16a-202.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 421, 2013 General Session

